Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Extreme weather conditions" means a:
1. Day for which the National Weather Service has issued either an
Extreme Cold Warning or Excessive Heat Warning for the county in
which the customer resides; or
2. Period of natural disaster in the county in which the customer resides.
As used in this paragraph, "natural disaster" means any natural
disaster resulting in the declaration of a state of emergency under
KRS 39A.100 or 39B.070; and
(b) "Utility" has the same meaning as in KRS 278.010(3)(a) and (b).
(2) A utility shall not disconnect or suspend residential service to a customer's
residence during extreme weather conditions.
(3) The commission shall issue an order setting forth any applicable rules and
procedures required to implement this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2025 10:44 AM Jacketed